Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 147.74, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5. A dentist may use the prefix âDr.â or âDoctorâ, but shall add after the personâs name the letters âD. D. S.â, or âD. M. D.â, or the word âdentistâ or âdental surgeonâ. A dental hygienist may use the words âregistered dental hygienistâ or the letters âR. D. H.â after the personâs name. A registered dental assistant may use the words âregistered dental assistantâ or the letters âR. D. A.â after the personâs name. Sec. 2. Section 153.14, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5. Persons registered to practice practicing as a dental assistant. Sec. 3. Section 153.33, subsection 5, paragraph a, subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: (1) Engages in a practice regulated by this chapter without a current license, registration, permit, or qualification. (2) Employs a person without a current license, registration, permit, or qualification to engage in a practice regulated by this chapter . House File 805, p. 2 Sec. 4. Section 153.38, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 153.38 Dental assistants ââ scope of practice. A registered dental assistant may perform those services of assistance to a licensed dentist as determined by the board by rule. A registered dental assistant with additional education and training, as provided by the board by rule, may become certified to perform expanded functions or become qualified to participate in dental radiography. A registered dental assistant who has successfully completed expanded function training through the university of Iowa college of dentistry or a program certified by the commission on dental accreditation may place dental sealants on teeth. Services performed by a registered dental assistant shall be performed under supervision of a licensed dentist, but this section shall not be construed to authorize a dental assistant to practice dentistry or dental hygiene. The board shall not adopt rules that delegate to a dental assistant the administration of local anesthesia or the removal of plaque, stain, calculus, or hard natural material except by toothbrush, floss, or rubber cup coronal polish. Every licensed dentist who utilizes the services of a registered dental assistant for the purpose of assistance in the practice of dentistry shall be responsible for acts delegated to the registered dental assistant. A dentist shall delegate to a registered dental assistant only those acts which are authorized to be delegated to registered dental assistants by the board. For the purposes of this section, âdental assistantâ includes registered dental assistants and dental assistants without a certificate of registration. Sec. 5. Section 153.39, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. A person shall not practice on or after July 1, 2001, as a registered dental assistant unless the person has registered with the board and received a certificate of registration pursuant to this chapter . Sec. 6. Section 153.39, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the following: House File 805, p. 3 5. A person may practice as a dental assistant without receiving a certificate of registration as described in this section if the person successfully completes a term of practical training under the supervision of a dentist. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A for the implementation of this subsection. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 805, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor